Illinois, session 104th, SB1238.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Public Health Powers and 5Duties Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is 6amended by adding Section 2310-735 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2310/2310-735 new)8    Sec. 2310-735. Nonopioid alternatives pamphlet. The 9Department may develop and publish on its website an 10educational pamphlet regarding the use of nonopioid 11alternatives for the treatment of acute nonoperative, acute 12perioperative, subacute, or chronic pain. The pamphlet may 13conform with the United States Department of Health and Human 14Services' Pain Management Best Practices Inter-Agency Task 15Force recommendations and shall include:16        (1) information on available nonopioid alternatives 17    for the treatment of pain, including available nonopioid 18    medicinal drugs or drug products and nonpharmacological 19    therapies; and20        (2) the advantages and disadvantages of the use of 21    nonopioid alternatives. 22    Section 10. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by   SB1238 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09624 BDA 19689 b1adding Section 370c.3 as follows: 2    (215 ILCS 5/370c.3 new)3    Sec. 370c.3. Parity for coverage for nonopioid medications 4to treat acute pain.5    (a) Beginning January 1, 2027, a health insurance issuer 6shall develop a plan to provide adequate coverage and access 7to a broad spectrum of pain management services, including, 8but not limited to, nonopioid, nonnarcotic pain management 9services and non-medication pain management services that 10serve as alternatives to the prescribing of opioid or narcotic 11drugs in accordance with guidelines developed by the 12Department of Insurance.13    (b) A health insurance issuer shall file the plan required 14under subsection (a) with the Department of Insurance and 15shall post information about the pain management plan on the 16insurer's publicly accessible website. 17    Section 15. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 18adding Section 5-58 as follows: 19    (305 ILCS 5/5-58 new)20    Sec. 5-58. Illinois Medicaid Preferred Drug List; 21nonopioid drugs. In establishing and maintaining the Illinois 22Medicaid Preferred Drug List as described in Section 5-30.14, 23the Department shall ensure that nonopioid drugs on the   SB1238 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09624 BDA 19689 b1Department's preferred drug list, and approved by the U.S. 2Food and Drug Administration, for the treatment or management 3of pain shall not be disadvantaged or discouraged with respect 4to coverage relative to any opioid or narcotic drug for the 5treatment or management of acute pain as long as the 6Department retains its authority to manage the Preferred Drug 7List process pursuant to State or federal law, rules, 8regulations, and policies and the Department's authority over 9the Preferred Drug List process is not undermined or 10compromised.